Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.040

Numbering—Transmittal to attorney general.

The secretary of state shall give a serial number to each initiative, referendum bill, or referendum measure, using a separate series for initiatives to the legislature, initiatives to the people, referendum bills, and referendum measures, and forthwith transmit one copy of the measure proposed bearing its serial number to the attorney general. Thereafter a measure shall be known and designated on all petitions, ballots, and proceedings as "Initiative Measure No. . . . .," "Referendum Bill No. . . . .," or "Referendum Measure No. . . . .."

[ 2023 c 109 s 4; 2008 c 1 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 960, approved November 6, 2007); 2003 c 111 s 1805; 1982 c 116 s 3; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.030. Prior: 1913 c 138 s 1, part; RRS s 5397, part. Formerly RCW 29.79.030.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 109: See note following RCW 29A.32.070.

Findings—Intent—Construction—Severability—Subheadings and part headings not law—Short title—Effective date—2008 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 960): See notes following RCW 43.135.031.